Illinois, session 104th, HB1556.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Animal Welfare Act is amended by changing 5Sections 2, 3.6, and 3.8 and by adding Section 3.10 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 605/2)  (from Ch. 8, par. 302)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act unless the 8context otherwise requires:9    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Agriculture.10    "Director" means the Director of the Illinois Department 11of Agriculture.12    "Pet shop operator" means any person who sells, offers to 13sell, exchange, or offers for adoption with or without charge 14or donation dogs, cats, birds, fish, reptiles, or other 15animals customarily obtained as pets in this State at retail 16to the public. However, a person who sells only such animals 17that he has produced and raised shall not be considered a pet 18shop operator under this Act, and a veterinary hospital or 19clinic operated by a veterinarian or veterinarians licensed 20under the Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act of 2004 21shall not be considered a pet shop operator under this Act.22    "Dog dealer" means any person who sells, offers to sell, 23exchange, or offers for adoption with or without charge or   HB1556- 2 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1donation dogs in this State. However, a person who sells only 2dogs that he has produced and raised shall not be considered a 3dog dealer under this Act, and a veterinary hospital or clinic 4operated by a veterinarian or veterinarians licensed under the 5Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act of 2004 shall not 6be considered a dog dealer under this Act.7    "Secretary of Agriculture" or "Secretary" means the 8Secretary of Agriculture of the United States Department of 9Agriculture.10    "Person" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership, 11association or other legal entity, any public or private 12institution, the State of Illinois, or any municipal 13corporation or political subdivision of the State.14    "Kennel operator" means any person who operates an 15establishment, other than an animal control facility, 16veterinary hospital, or animal shelter, where dogs or dogs and 17cats are maintained for boarding, training or similar purposes 18for a fee or compensation.19    "Boarding" means a time frame greater than 12 hours or an 20overnight period during which an animal is kept by a kennel 21operator. 22    "Cat breeder" means a person who sells, offers to sell, 23exchanges, or offers for adoption with or without charge cats 24that he or she has produced and raised. A person who owns, has 25possession of, or harbors 5 or less females capable of 26reproduction shall not be considered a cat breeder.   HB1556- 3 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1    "Dog breeder" means a person who sells, offers to sell, 2exchanges, or offers for adoption with or without charge dogs 3that he has produced and raised. A person who owns, has 4possession of, or harbors 5 or less females capable of 5reproduction shall not be considered a dog breeder. 6    "Animal control facility" means any facility operated by 7or under contract for the State, county, or any municipal 8corporation or political subdivision of the State for the 9purpose of impounding or harboring seized, stray, homeless, 10abandoned or unwanted dogs, cats, and other animals. "Animal 11control facility" also means any veterinary hospital or clinic 12operated by a veterinarian or veterinarians licensed under the 13Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act of 2004 which 14operates for the above mentioned purpose in addition to its 15customary purposes.16    "Animal shelter" means a facility operated, owned, or 17maintained by a duly incorporated humane society, animal 18welfare society, or other non-profit organization having 19tax-exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal 20Revenue Code for the purpose of providing for and promoting 21the welfare, protection, and humane treatment of animals. An 22organization that does not have its own building that 23maintains animals solely in foster homes or other licensees is 24an "animal shelter" for purposes of this Act. "Animal shelter" 25also means any veterinary hospital or clinic operated by a 26veterinarian or veterinarians licensed under the Veterinary   HB1556- 4 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1Medicine and Surgery Practice Act of 2004 which operates for 2the above mentioned purpose in addition to its customary 3purposes.4    "Day care operator" means a person who operates an 5establishment, other than an animal control facility, 6veterinary hospital, or animal shelter, where dogs or dogs and 7cats are kept for a period of time not exceeding 12 hours. 8    "Foster home" means an entity that accepts the 9responsibility for stewardship of animals that are the 10obligation of an animal shelter or animal control facility, 11not to exceed 4 foster animals or 2 litters under 8 weeks of 12age at any given time. A written agreement to operate as a 13"foster home" shall be contracted with the animal shelter or 14animal control facility.15    "Guard dog service" means an entity that, for a fee, 16furnishes or leases guard or sentry dogs for the protection of 17life or property. A person is not a guard dog service solely 18because he or she owns a dog and uses it to guard his or her 19home, business, or farmland.20    "Guard dog" means a type of dog used primarily for the 21purpose of defending, patrolling, or protecting property or 22life at a commercial establishment other than a farm. "Guard 23dog" does not include stock dogs used primarily for handling 24and controlling livestock or farm animals, nor does it include 25personally owned pets that also provide security.26    "Return" in return to field or trap, neuter, return   HB1556- 5 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1program means to return the cat to field after it has been 2sterilized and vaccinated for rabies. 3    "Sentry dog" means a dog trained to work without 4supervision in a fenced facility other than a farm, and to 5deter or detain unauthorized persons found within the 6facility.7    "Probationary status" means the 12-month period following 8a series of violations of this Act during which any further 9violation shall result in an automatic 12-month suspension of 10licensure. 11    "Owner" means any person having a right of property in an 12animal, who keeps or harbors an animal, who has an animal in 13his or her care or acts as its custodian, or who knowingly 14permits a dog to remain on any premises occupied by him or her. 15"Owner" does not include a feral cat caretaker participating 16in a trap, spay/neuter, vaccinate for rabies, and return 17program. 18    "Offer for sale" means to sell, exchange for 19consideration, offer for adoption, advertise for the sale of, 20barter, auction, give away, or otherwise dispose of animals. 21    "Professional breeder" means a legal entity or individual 22that conducts business within this State and that owns, has 23possession of, or houses more than 5 breeding female dogs, is 24required to be licensed and regulated under the federal Animal 25Welfare Act by the United States Department of Agriculture, 26and, in return for a fee or consideration, sells or adopts the   HB1556- 6 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1offspring of the breeding dogs to the public, a pet store, or a 2tax-exempt rescue organization. 3(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-295, eff. 8-9-19; 4102-586, eff. 2-23-22.) 5    (225 ILCS 605/3.6)6    Sec. 3.6. Acceptance of stray dogs and cats.7    (a) No animal shelter may accept a stray dog or cat unless 8the animal is reported by the shelter to the animal control or 9law enforcement of the county in which the animal is found by 10the next business day. An animal shelter may accept animals 11from: (1) the owner of the animal where the owner signs a 12relinquishment form which states he or she is the owner of the 13animal; (2) an animal shelter licensed under this Act; or (3) 14an out-of-state animal control facility, rescue group, or 15animal shelter that is duly licensed in their state or is a 16not-for-profit organization. An animal shelter shall not 17accept a dog or cat from an organization described in item (2) 18or (3) unless it obtains documentation attesting that the dog 19or cat was not obtained through compensation or payment made 20to a cat breeder, dog breeder, dog dealer, or dog broker. 21    (b) When stray dogs and cats are accepted by an animal 22shelter, they must be scanned for the presence of a microchip 23and examined for other currently-acceptable methods of 24identification, including, but not limited to, identification 25tags, tattoos, and rabies license tags. The examination for   HB1556- 7 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1identification shall be done within 24 hours after the intake 2of each dog or cat. The animal shelter shall notify the owner 3and transfer any dog with an identified owner to the animal 4control or law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which 5it was found or the local animal control agency for 6redemption.7    (c) If no transfer can occur, the animal shelter shall 8make every reasonable attempt to contact the owner, agent, or 9caretaker as soon as possible. The animal shelter shall give 10notice of not less than 7 business days to the owner, agent, or 11caretaker prior to disposal of the animal. The notice shall be 12mailed to the last known address of the owner, agent, or 13caretaker. Testimony of the animal shelter, or its authorized 14agent, who mails the notice shall be evidence of the receipt of 15the notice by the owner, agent, or caretaker of the animal. A 16mailed notice shall remain the primary means of owner, agent, 17or caretaker contact; however, the animal shelter shall also 18attempt to contact the owner, agent, or caretaker by any other 19contact information, such as by telephone or email address, 20provided by the microchip or other method of identification 21found on the dog or cat. If the dog or cat has been 22microchipped and the primary contact listed by the chip 23manufacturer cannot be located or refuses to reclaim the dog 24or cat, an attempt shall be made to contact any secondary 25contacts listed by the chip manufacturer or the purchaser of 26the microchip if the purchaser is a nonprofit organization,   HB1556- 8 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1animal shelter, animal control facility, pet store, breeder, 2or veterinary office prior to adoption, transfer, or 3euthanization. Prior to transferring any stray dog or cat to 4another humane shelter, pet store, rescue group, or 5euthanization, the dog or cat shall be scanned again for the 6presence of a microchip and examined for other means of 7identification. If a second scan provides the same identifying 8information as the initial intake scan and the owner, agent, 9or caretaker has not been located or refuses to reclaim the dog 10or cat, the animal shelter may proceed with adoption, 11transfer, or euthanization.12    (d) When stray dogs and cats are accepted by an animal 13shelter and no owner can be identified, the shelter shall hold 14the animal for the period specified in local ordinance prior 15to adoption, transfer, or euthanasia. The animal shelter shall 16allow access to the public to view the animals housed there. If 17a dog is identified by an owner who desires to make redemption 18of it, the dog shall be transferred to the local animal control 19for redemption. If no transfer can occur, the animal shelter 20shall proceed pursuant to Section 3.7. Upon lapse of the hold 21period specified in local ordinance and no owner can be 22identified, ownership of the animal, by operation of law, 23transfers to the shelter that has custody of the animal.24    (e) No representative of an animal shelter may enter 25private property and remove an animal without permission from 26the property owner and animal owner, nor can any   HB1556- 9 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1representative of an animal shelter direct another individual 2to enter private property and remove an animal unless that 3individual is an approved humane investigator (approved by the 4Department) operating pursuant to the provisions of the Humane 5Care for Animals Act.6    (f) Nothing in this Section limits an animal shelter and 7an animal control facility who, through mutual agreement, wish 8to enter into an agreement for animal control, boarding, 9holding, measures to improve life-saving, or other services 10provided that the agreement requires parties adhere to the 11provisions of the Animal Control Act, the Humane Euthanasia in 12Animal Shelters Act, and the Humane Care for Animals Act.13    (g) An animal shelter shall not obtain a dog or cat by any 14means other than owner surrender, transfer from an animal 15control facility, an order by law enforcement, a court order, 16or an animal shelter in compliance with subsection (a). 17(Source: P.A. 99-310, eff. 1-1-16; 100-322, eff. 8-24-17; 18100-870, eff. 1-1-19.) 19    (225 ILCS 605/3.8)20    Sec. 3.8. Requirements Prohibition of dogs and cats sold 21by pet shops; recordkeeping.22    (a) A pet shop operator or dog dealer may offer for sale a 23dog or cat only if the dog or cat is obtained from an animal 24control facility, or animal shelter, or professional breeder 25located in-state or out-of-state, that is in compliance with   HB1556- 10 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1Section 3.9 or Section 3.10. 2    (b) (Blank). A pet shop operator shall keep a record of 3each dog or cat offered for sale. The record must be kept on 4file for a period of 2 years following the acquisition of each 5dog or cat, made available to the Department upon request, and 6submitted to the Department on May 1 and November 1 of each 7year. The record shall include the following: 8        (1) name, address, and phone number of the animal 9    control facilityor animal shelter each dog or cat was 10    obtained from; and 11        (2) documentation from the animal control facility or 12    animal shelter each dog or cat was obtained from 13    demonstrating compliance with Section 3.9, including the 14    circumstances that led to the animal control facility or 15    animal shelter obtaining ownership of the dog or cat and 16    any other information indicating the dog or cat was not 17    obtained from a source prohibited in Section 3.9. 18    (c) In addition to the penalties set forth in Section 1920.5, a pet shop operator that violates subsection (a) shall 20no longer offer for sale a dog or cat regardless of where the 21dog or cat was obtained. 22    (d) Nothing in this Section prohibits a pet shop operator 23from providing space to an animal control facility or animal 24shelter to showcase dogs or cats owned by these entities for 25the purpose of adoption. 26(Source: P.A. 102-586, eff. 2-23-22.)   HB1556- 11 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1    (225 ILCS 605/3.10 new)2    Sec. 3.10. Requirements of professional dog breeders.3    (a) In addition to the sourcing requirements in Section 43.08, a pet shop operator or dog dealer shall also submit 5records to the Department that attest that dogs offered for 6sale are obtained from a professional breeder and that the pet 7shop operator or dog dealer are in compliance with this 8Section.9    (b) A professional breeder violates this Section if any 2 10of the following conditions are not met: 11        (1) Primary enclosures comply with the following:12            (A)(i) Prior to December 31, 2026, a primary 13        enclosure provides each dog with a minimum amount of 14        floor space, in square inches, that is equal to at 15        least 2 times the square of the length of the dog 16        housed in the enclosure in inches, as measured from 17        the tip of the nose to the base of the tail plus 6 18        inches; or (ii) on and after December 31, 2026, a 19        primary enclosure provides each dog with a minimum 20        amount of floor space, in square inches, that is equal 21        to at least 2 times the square of the length of the dog 22        housed in the enclosure in inches, as measured from 23        the tip of the nose to the base of the tail plus 9 24        inches. For each additional dog that is kept or 25        confined in a primary enclosure, the enclosure shall   HB1556- 12 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1        have additional floor space in square inches equal to 2        the square of the length of the dog housed in the 3        enclosure in inches, as measured from the tip of the 4        nose to the base of the tail plus 9 inches. 5            (B) The primary enclosures have solid or slatted 6        floors and may consist of coated or expanded metal 7        flooring. The mandatory minimum space required for 8        primary enclosures in professional breeding facilities 9        shall have solid floors or flooring that is slatted 10        with slats that are at least 3.5 inches in width with 11        no more than half-inch gaps between slats. Flooring 12        shall be constructed in a manner that protects the 13        dogs' feet and legs from injury and that will not allow 14        the dogs' feet to pass through any openings in the 15        floor.16            (C) The primary enclosures consist of materials 17        that can be cleaned and sanitized, are safe for the 18        breed, size, and age of the dog, are free from 19        protruding sharp edges, and are designed so that the 20        paw of the dog is unable to extend through or become 21        caught in the flooring.22            (D) If the flooring surface of the primary 23        enclosure consists of a material that is not solid, 24        the primary enclosure has a solid resting area that 25        can accommodate the full length of the dog while lying 26        down.  HB1556- 13 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1            (E) The flooring of the primary enclosure does not 2        sag, bend, or bounce.3            (F) The primary enclosures are not stacked on top 4        of one another.5            (G) The indoor temperatures of the primary 6        enclosures do not exceed below 45 degrees Fahrenheit 7        or above 85 degrees Fahrenheit for more than 2 hours, 8        unless a variation is recommended in consultation with 9        a licensed veterinarian. 10        (2) Breeding practices and veterinary care shall 11    comply with the following: 12            (A) A breeding female shall receive an examination 13        by a licensed veterinarian prior to its first breeding 14        cycle to ensure the female is healthy enough to be 15        bred. 16            (B) Annual veterinarian exams shall include, but 17        are not limited to: (i) a hands-on examination by a 18        veterinarian, including a comprehensive physical 19        examination, dental assessment, body condition 20        scoring, and pain assessment, at least once a year to 21        ensure health problems are identified and treated; 22        (ii) an assessment that a breeding female has received 23        adequate rest between litters to allow for proper 24        physical recovery and remains healthy enough to be 25        bred prior to its next breeding cycle; and (iii) 26        regular fur grooming and nail trimming as needed for   HB1556- 14 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1        the safety and comfort of the dog based on that dog's 2        breed or at least twice a year. 3            (C) Canine cesarean sections and euthanasia are to 4        be performed only by licensed veterinarians. 5            (D) Retention of veterinarian records detailing 6        the program of care to ensure professional breeding 7        facilities provide the necessary care routinely 8        prescribed to companion animals. 9            (E) Unless otherwise directed by a veterinarian, 10        the dog is provided, twice each day, food that is 11        sufficient to maintain body condition and weight as 12        directed by a veterinarian. The food shall be 13        unspoiled and uncontaminated, provided in accordance 14        with a nutritional plan recommended by a veterinarian, 15        and served in receptacles that are clean and sanitary. 16            (F) Each day, the dog is provided access to a 17        continuous supply of potable water that is in clean 18        and sanitary receptacles and is of sufficient quality 19        and quantity to ensure maintenance of normal body 20        condition and growth unless otherwise directed by a 21        veterinarian. 22            (G) The breeder shall comply with a vaccination 23        and parasite control program that is approved by a 24        veterinarian and that is consistent with 25        recommendations of the American Veterinary Medical 26        Association or the American Animal Hospital   HB1556- 15 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1        Association. 2        (3) All adult dogs in professional breeding facilities 3    have either constant, unfettered access or supervised 4    daily access to an exercise area of sufficient size to 5    ensure proper physical development, health, and 6    socialization. Socialization includes, but is not limited 7    to, daily petting, stroking, grooming, feeding, playing 8    with, exercising, or other touching of the dog that is 9    beneficial to the well-being of the dog. The exercise area 10    should, at a minimum, be at least twice the amount of space 11    required for the primary enclosure. The exercise area may 12    be indoors or outdoors. The exercise and socialization 13    program must be approved and certified by a licensed 14    veterinarian. 15        (4) If a dog is no longer to be bred or a veterinarian 16    determines the dog is no longer healthy enough to be bred, 17    the breeder shall retire the animal. If the breeder 18    chooses not to keep the dog, the breeder must make all 19    reasonable efforts to find placement with an adoptive 20    family, rescue organization, or other appropriate owner 21    for that animal. 22        (5) A professional breeder shall maintain all 23    veterinarian and animal care records for each animal for 2 24    years after ceasing to own the animal. A professional 25    breeder shall provide a copy of all veterinarian records, 26    audit records, and inspection reports upon the sale of any   HB1556- 16 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1    animal. A pet store operator or dog dealer shall make 2    available copies of all veterinarian records, audit 3    records, and inspection reports of any animal to the 4    Department upon request. 5    (c) In addition to the penalties set forth in Section 620.5: 7        (1) Whenever the Attorney General has reason to 8    believe that a professional breeder is intentionally or 9    recklessly using any method, act, or practice that is in 10    violation of Section 3.10 and that proceedings would be in 11    the public interest, the Attorney General may bring an 12    action against such professional breeder to restrain by 13    preliminary or permanent injunction the use of such 14    method, act, or practice. 15        (2) Any person who received a dog or cat from a 16    professional breeder and who suffers actual damage may 17    bring an action for injunctive relief against a 18    professional breeder who intentionally or recklessly 19    violates Section 3.10. The court, in its discretion, may 20    restrain by preliminary or permanent injunction the use of 21    such method, act, or practice that is in violation of 22    Section 3.10. 23        (3) Prior to bringing an action under paragraph (2), a 24    person must first send notice to the Department of the 25    person's intent to file an action and shall include a list 26    of alleged violations. Actions pursuant to paragraph (2)   HB1556- 17 -LRB104 08256 AAS 18306 b1    may be brought if, prior to initiating an action against a 2    professional breeder, the Department provides the 3    professional breeder 30 days' written notice identifying 4    the specific provisions of this Act the professional 5    breeder is alleged to be violating. In the event a cure is 6    possible, if within 30 days the professional breeder 7    actually cures the noticed violation and provides the 8    Department with an express written statement that the 9    violations have been cured and no further violations shall 10    occur, no action may be initiated against the professional 11    breeder. If a professional breeder continues to violate 12    Section 3.10 in breach of the express written statement 13    provided under this Section, the person may initiate an 14    action against the professional breeder to enforce the 15    written statement and may pursue damages for each breach 16    of the express written statement, as well as any other 17    violation of Section 3.10 that postdates the written 18    statement.